Hawaii statutes.
§457-12 Discipline; grounds; proceedings;
hearings. (a) In addition to any other actions authorized by law, the
board shall have the power to deny, revoke, limit, or suspend any license to
practice nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse applied
for or issued by the board in accordance with this chapter, and to fine or to
otherwise discipline a licensee for any cause authorized by law, including but
not limited to the following:

(1) Fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure
a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical
nurse;

(2) Gross immorality;

(3) Unfitness or incompetence by reason of
negligence, habits, or other causes;

(4) Habitual intemperance, addiction to, or
dependency on alcohol or other habit-forming substances;

(5) Mental incompetence;

(6) Unprofessional conduct as defined by the board in
accordance with its own rules;

(7) Wilful or repeated violation of any of the
provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board;

(8) Revocation, suspension, limitation, or other
disciplinary action by another state of a nursing license;

(9) Conviction, whether by nolo contendere or
otherwise, of a penal offense substantially related to the qualifications,
functions, or duties of a nurse, notwithstanding any statutory provision to the
contrary;

(10) Failure to report to the board any disciplinary
action taken against the licensee in another jurisdiction within thirty days
after the disciplinary action becomes final;

(11) Submitting to or filing with the board any
notice, statement, or other document required under this chapter, which is
false or untrue or contains any material misstatement of fact, including a
false attestation of compliance with continuing competency requirements; or

(12) Violation of the conditions or limitations upon
which any license is issued.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the board may deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state. Any final order entered pursuant to this
subsection shall be a matter of public record.

(c) Any fine imposed by the board after a
hearing in accordance with chapter 91 shall be no less than $100 and no more
than $1,000 for each violation.

(d) The remedies or penalties provided by this
chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available
under all other laws of this State. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 31,
§20; am L 1974, c 205, §2(17); am L 1983, c 119, §9; am L 1986, c 27, §1; am L
1992, c 202, §111; am L 2015, c 127, §4; am L 2016, c 38, §8]

Cross References

Diversion program for chemically dependent nurses, see
chapter 334D.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next